Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-605.02
Death certificate; death in military service outside continental limits of United States; fees.

The department shall preserve permanently all such certificates and shall charge and collect in advance the fee prescribed in section 71-612, to be paid by the applicant for each certified copy supplied to the applicant or for any search made at the applicant's request for access to or a certified copy of any record, whether or not the record is found on file with the department. All fees so collected shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund as provided in section 71-612.

Laws 1947, c. 233, § 2, p. 739;

Laws 1965, c. 419, § 1, p. 1342;

Laws 1967, c. 442, § 1, p. 1382;

Laws 1973, LB 583, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 29;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 48;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 519;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 407;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 93.